Washington statutes.
RCW 26.44.275

Commercial sexual abuse—Use of validated assessment tool to screen. (Effective July 1, 2025.)

(1) The department must use a validated assessment tool to screen a child for commercial sexual abuse of a minor if a report of abuse and neglect under RCW 26.44.030 alleges commercial sexual abuse of a minor.

(2) Whenever there is reasonable cause to believe that a child under the jurisdiction of a juvenile justice agency has suffered commercial sexual abuse of a minor, the juvenile justice agency must use a validated assessment tool to screen the child for commercial sexual abuse of a minor and report such abuse and neglect pursuant to RCW 26.44.030.

(3) For purposes of this section, "juvenile justice agency" means any of the following: Law enforcement; diversion units; juvenile courts; detention centers; and persons or public or private agencies having children committed to their custody.

[ 2024 c 298 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 298: See note following RCW 9A.40.100.